Utah statutes.
78B-4-607.   Scope.

(1)  Courts of this state shall construe this part liberally with regard to successors.

(2)  This part shall apply to an asbestos claim filed against a successor on or after May 8, 2012.  This part shall apply to a pending asbestos claim against a successor in which trial has not commenced as of May 8, 2012, except that any provision of this part that would be unconstitutional if applied retroactively shall be applied prospectively.

